Alabama, session 2026rs, HB396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
41 Section 1. Section 16-6C-2 of the Code of Alabama 1975,
42 is amended to read as follows:
43 "§16-6C-2
44 (a) In addition to any other labels or designations
45 assigned to public schools and public school districts
46 pursuant to a federal, state, school, district, or other
47 assessment or accountability system, the State Superintendent
48 of Education, consistent with this chapter, shall develop a
49 school grading system reflective of school and district
50 performance. The grading system shall utilize the traditional
51 A, B, C, D, or F framework.
52 (1) Schools receiving a grade of "A" are making
53 excellent progress.
54 (2) Schools receiving a grade of "B" are making above
55 average progress.
56 (3) Schools receiving a grade of "C" are making
Page 2

(3) Schools receiving a grade of "C" are making
HB396 INTRODUCED
57 satisfactory progress.
58 (4) Schools receiving a grade of "D" are making less
59 than satisfactory progress.
60 (5) Schools receiving a grade of "F" are failing to
61 make adequate progress.
62 (b) In developing this school grading system, the State
63 Superintendent of Education shall seek input from parents,
64 teachers, school administrators, existing State Department of
65 Education advisory groups or task forces, and other education
66 stakeholders on how the system can properly reflect not only
67 the overall academic proficiency of each public school but
68 also the academic improvements made by each public school,
69 along with other key performance indicators that give a total
70 profile of the school or the school system, or both.
71 (c)(b) The State Superintendent of Education shall
72 prescribe update the design and content of the an improved
73 school grading system by not later than December 31, 2012
74 2026. It is the intent of the Legislature that the system be
75 in place by no later than the 2013-2014 school year. The
76 system may not be utilized by the State Superintendent of
77 Education or the State Department of Education until
78 sufficient rules have been adopted by the State Board of
79 Education pursuant to the Alabama Administrative Procedure
80 Act.
81 (d)(c) Using an easy to understand grading scale, the
82 school grading system shall describe achievement in the state,
83 each district, and each school. Additionally, the State
84 Superintendent of Education shall not be precluded from also
Page 3

Superintendent of Education shall not be precluded from also
HB396 INTRODUCED
85 assigning grades to school feeder patterns or grades that
86 reflect the fiscal health and fiscal efficiency of a school or
87 school system.
88 (e)(d) The State Superintendent of Education shall make
89 these grades available to the general public and shall post
90 these grades on the website of the State Department of
91 Education as soon as the grades are available. Additionally,
92 appropriate grade information shall be delivered to the parent
93 or guardian of each public school student at least once
94 annually in the same manner that student report cards are
95 currently delivered.
96 (f)(e)(1) Using annual criterion-based,
97 state-authorized summative assessments and other key
98 performance indicators that give a total profile of the school
99 or the school system, or both, a school's grade, at a minimum,
100 shall be based on a combination of student achievement scores,
101 achievement gap, college and career readiness, learning gains
102 of all students, learning gains of the lowest performing 25
103 percent of students, and other indicators as determined by the
104 State Superintendent of Education to impact student learning
105 and success college and career readiness.
106 (2)a. Each school that does not include a 12th-grade
107 class shall use the following indicators:
108 1. Student academic achievement using annual
109 criterion-based, state-authorized summative assessments shall
110 be weighted at 40 percent with 20 percent for Language Arts
111 and 20 percent for Math.
112 2. Student academic achievement growth using annual
Page 4

2. Student academic achievement growth using annual
HB396 INTRODUCED
113 criterion-based, state-authorized summative assessments, as
114 determined by a criterion-based measure, shall be weighted at
115 40 percent.
116 3. Student academic achievement growth for the lowest
117 performing 25 percent of students, as determined by using
118 annual criterion-based, state-authorized summative
119 assessments, shall be weighted at 20 percent with 10 percent
120 for Language Arts and 10 percent for Math.
121 b. Each school that includes a 12th-grade class shall
122 use the following indicators:
123 1. Student academic achievement using annual
124 criterion-based, state-authorized summative assessments shall
125 be weighted at 30 percent.
126 2. Student academic achievement growth, as determined
127 by a criterion-based measure, shall be weighted at 20 percent.
128 3. Student academic achievement growth for the lowest
129 performing 25 percent of students, as determined by using
130 annual criterion-based, state-authorized summative
131 assessments, shall be weighted at 10 percent with 5 percent
132 for Language Arts and 5 percent for Math.
133 4. Additionally, college and career readiness shall be
134 weighted at 30 percent and graduation rate shall be rated at
135 10 percent. College and career readiness shall include the
136 following:
137 (i) Benchmark on ACT;
138 (ii) Successful completion of an international
139 baccalaureate (IB) program with a qualifying score of four or
140 above; dual enrollment college credit of A or B; or Advanced
Page 5

above; dual enrollment college credit of A or B; or Advanced
HB396 INTRODUCED
141 Placement classes with a qualifying score of three or above;
142 (iii) Scoring gold or platinum on WorkKeys.
143 (iv) Possessing an industry-recognized credential of
144 value for high-demand, high-wage jobs.
145 (v) Successful completion of an apprenticeship or a
146 work-based learning or career technical degree.
147 (3) The State Department of Education shall ensure
148 proficiency on the statewide summative assessment is aligned
149 to the National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP).
150 (4) To ensure that the college and career readiness
151 indicators accurately signal that students are prepared for
152 high-wage, high-growth opportunities in this state, the
153 Alabama Workforce Board, in consultation with the State
154 Department of Education, shall develop a system for
155 collecting, analyzing, and reporting the public school student
156 outcomes associated with the completion of college and career
157 readiness indicators in this section. This shall include an
158 annual legislative report that captures the education system's
159 return on investment, ensuring the state captures and reports
160 on results beyond what is in the accountability formula
161 including, but not limited to:
162 a. Postsecondary enrollment and persistence;
163 b. Military enlistment;
164 c. Industry-recognized credentials;
165 d. Median income within six years after graduation; and
166 e. High-wage, high-demand career sectors.
167 (5) When 60 percent of all public schools and public
168 local education agencies earn either an A or B on the state
Page 6

local education agencies earn either an A or B on the state
HB396 INTRODUCED
169 A-F school grading system, the grading scale for all letter
170 grades awarded shall be raised 10 points the following year.
171 (2)a.(f)(1) Commencing with the 2021-2022 school year,
172 the academic achievement of each student identified as an
173 English language learner who has not shown proficiency on
174 ACCESS for EL, or other state-approved English proficiency
175 assessment, may not be considered in assigning an academic
176 achievement grade to a school or school system for the first
177 five years of enrollment of the student. The educational
178 progress of each of these students shall continue to be
179 measured in the academic growth category and the progress in
180 English language proficiency category, and, at the end of the
181 five-year period for the student, his or her proficiency shall
182 again be considered in assigning an academic achievement grade
183 to a school or school system on the state A-F school grading
184 system.
185 b.(2) Commencing with the 2024-2025 school year, the
186 academic achievement of each student identified as a transfer
187 student from a nonpublic school may not be considered in
188 assigning an academic achievement grade to a school or school
189 system for the first three years of enrollment of the transfer
190 student. The educational progress of each of these transfer
191 students shall continue to be measured in the academic growth
192 category, and, beginning with the fourth year of enrollment of
193 the transfer student, his or her academic achievement shall be
194 considered in assigning an academic achievement grade to a
195 school or school system on the state A-F school grading
196 system.
Page 7

system.
HB396 INTRODUCED
197 (3)(g) The State Superintendent of Education may not
198 amend the state Every Student Succeeds Act option for
199 including test scores of English language learners enrolled in
200 United States schools. The option provides as follows: For the
201 first year of enrollment, the test scores shall be reported,
202 but the results on both the reading/language arts and math
203 tests shall be excluded from the federal accountability
204 system; for the second year of enrollment, a measure of
205 student growth on both tests shall be included in the federal
206 accountability system; and for the third year of enrollment,
207 proficiency on both tests shall be included in the federal
208 accountability system. Additionally, the option requires
209 English language learners who have successfully left the
210 English language learner subgroup by attaining English
211 proficiency to be included in that subgroup for accountability
212 purposes for four years.
213 (h) To further the intent of the Legislature to create
214 transparency and ensure all agencies uphold the purposes of
215 this section, the State Superintendent of Education shall
216 oversee the creation and operation of a standing
217 Accountability Council. The Accountability Council shall meet
218 at least annually to review the entire accountability system
219 and annual return on investment study, and provide
220 recommendations for any needed revisions to the Governor, the
221 Legislature, the State Board of Education, and the State
222 Department of Education. The goal of the Accountability
223 Council is to ensure that all Alabama students are succeeding
224 and will continue to succeed in the future. The membership of
Page 8

and will continue to succeed in the future. The membership of
HB396 INTRODUCED
225 the Accountability Council shall consist of all of the
226 following:
227 (1) Three members appointed by the Governor. One
228 at-large member, one member who is a national expert on school
229 accountability, and one member who is from the business
230 community.
231 (2) One member each appointed by the following:
232 a. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
233 b. The Speaker of the House of Representatives.
234 c. The State Superintendent of Education.
235 d. The Alabama Education Association.
236 e. The School Superintendents of Alabama.
237 f. The Alabama Association of School Boards.
238 g. The Council for Leaders in Alabama Schools.
239 h. The A+ Education Partnership.
240 (g)(i) The A-F school grading system shall be
241 consistently applied so that grades of one school or system
242 may be compared to the grades of any other school or system."
243 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
244 1, 2026.
Page 9